Utah statutes.
61-2b-39.   License or certification history.
The division may, upon payment of a fee in an amount specified in rule, issue
to any person a verified license history of:
(1)  any person licensed or certified under this chapter; or
(2)  any person previously registered, licensed, or certified under this
chapter.
